Oklahoma, session 2025, SB145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4.3 of Title 57, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any facility administered by the Department of Corrections


shall provide clean and safe accommodations for the pumping,


storage, and delivery of breast milk for inmates who are lactating.


Such accommodations shall include, but not be limited to:


1. Equipment with which to pump breastmilk;


2. Breastmilk storage bags;


3. Refrigeration or freezing of breastmilk; and


4. Safe handling of the breastmilk from the facility to an


individual designated by the inmate to collect the breastmilk.



Req. No. 276 Page 1


B. The Department of Corrections shall promulgate rules to


administer the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-276 CN 12/30/2024 10:22:49 AM







































Req. No. 276 Page 2